Hawaii statutes.
§304A-104 Regents; appointment; tenure;
qualifications; meetings. (a) The affairs of the university shall be
under the general management and control of the board of regents. The board
shall consist of fifteen members who shall be appointed by the governor from
lists of qualified candidates presented to the governor by the candidate
advisory council, pursuant to section 304A-104.6, and shall be confirmed by the
senate; provided that if the list of qualified candidates includes fewer than
three candidates at any time during the nomination and confirmation process,
the governor may request that the candidate advisory council reopen recruitment
for qualified candidates. Members may be removed by the governor. Except as
otherwise provided by law, state officers shall be eligible for appointment and
membership.

The term of each member shall be five years,
except as provided for the initial appointment in section 26-11; provided that
the term of the student member shall be two years. Every member may serve
beyond the expiration date of the member's term of appointment until the
member's successor has been appointed by the governor and confirmed by the
senate in accordance with article X, section 6 of the Hawaii State Constitution.
Members shall serve no more than two consecutive five-year terms; provided that
the members who are initially appointed to terms of two years or less pursuant
to section 26-11(a) may be reappointed to two ensuing five-year terms. If a
member is to be appointed to a second term of five years, the senate shall
consider the question of whether to reconfirm the member at least one hundred
twenty days prior to the conclusion of a member's first five-year term;
provided that if the senate is not in session within one hundred twenty days
prior to the conclusion of the member's first five-year term, the member shall
continue to serve until the senate convenes for the next regular session or the
next special session for which the senate is authorized to consider the
question of reconfirmation.

(b) In determining whether to confirm the
governor's nominee to the board of regents, the senate shall consider the
combination of abilities, breadth of experiences, and characteristics of the
board of regents, as a whole, that will best serve the diverse interests and
needs of the students of the university system and assist the university system
in achieving its strategic goals and performance indicators. The senate shall
consider whether the board reflects the diversity of the student population, the
various counties of the State, and a broad representation of higher
education-related stakeholders.

(c) At its first meeting after June 30 of each
year, the board of regents shall elect a chairperson and one or more
vice-chairpersons who shall serve until the adjournment of the first meeting of
the board of regents after June 30 of the next year, or thereafter until their
successors are elected; provided that the chairperson and vice chairpersons
shall not be elected prior to the taking of office of regents whose terms shall
begin on July 1 of that year. The board shall appoint a secretary, who
shall not be a member of the board. The president of the university shall act
as executive officer of the board. A majority of the board of regents shall
constitute a quorum to conduct business, and the concurrence of a majority of
all the members to which the board of regents is entitled shall be necessary to
make any action of the board of regents valid. The board shall meet at least
ten times annually and, from time to time, may meet in each of the counties of
Hawaii, Maui, and Kauai.

(d) The governor shall notify the candidate
advisory council for the board of regents of the University of Hawaii in
writing within ten days of receiving notification that a member of the board of
regents is resigning or has died, or is being removed by the governor.

(e) The members of the board of regents shall
serve without pay but shall be entitled to their travel expenses within the
State when attending meetings of the board or when actually engaged in business
relating to the work of the board. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2; am L 2007, c 56, §4;
am L Sp 2008, c 9, §3; am L 2011, c 50, §1; am L 2013, c 72, §3]

Revision Note

"May 1, 2007" substituted for "the effective
date of this Act".

Cross References

Boards, generally, see §26-34.

Case Notes

Respondent's application of the holdover provision of
subsection (a) to the six regents whose terms had expired contravened L 2007,
Act 56, §§1 and 5 and was contrary to the modified appointment process for
regents prescribed by the Hawaii constitution, article X, §6. 119 H. 341, 198
P.3d 604 (2008).

The governor's nondiscretionary duty—pursuant to the Hawaii
constitution, article X, §6, §304A-104.5(e), and subsection (a)—to nominate and
appoint members of the board of regents of the University of Hawaii, is subject
to a reasonable time standard; reasonable time is judged by the totality of the
circumstances; the passage of nearly ten months since the governor was
presented with the regent candidate list was an unreasonable period of time for
the governor to perform this constitutional and statutory duty and the governor
was thus subject to mandamus. 119 H. 341, 198 P.3d 604 (2008).

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next